Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5537.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 473a. (1) A person shall not grow, synthesize, sell, offer to sell, give, import, or distribute kratom or a synthetic variant of kratom. A person that violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), if a violation of this section occurs after a prior conviction under this section, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 180 days, a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), if a violation of this section involves selling, offering to sell, giving, or distributing kratom or a synthetic variant of kratom to an individual who is less than 18 years of age, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (d) If a violation of this section involves selling, offering to sell, giving, or distributing kratom or a synthetic variant of kratom to an individual who is less than 18 years of age and it occurs after a prior conviction under subdivision (c), the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (2) This section does not apply to kratom that has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration as a drug product, a dietary supplement, or a food additive in conventional food. The exception provided for in this subsection does not apply to a synthetic variant of kratom. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Kratom" means a product containing any part of the plant Mitragyna speciose, whether growing or not; the leaves of that plant; any extract or resin from any part of that plant; and every compound, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of that plant or its leaves, seeds, or extracts. (b) "Synthetic variant of kratom" means any synthetic form of kratom, including, but not limited to, 7-hydroxymitragynine (7-OH). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.